District of Columbia statutes.
38-1801.03

District of Columbia Council report.

Not later than April 1, 1997, the Chairperson of the District of Columbia Council shall submit to the appropriate congressional committees a report describing legislative and other actions the District of Columbia Council has taken or will take to facilitate the implementation of the goals of the long-term reform plan.

Apr. 26, 1996, 110 Stat. 1321 234, Pub. L. 104-134, § 2103

History

1981 Ed., § 31-2853.3.

Prior Codifications